Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB43.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 72.415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of enforcing[ the provisions of] KRS 72.410 to 72.470, coroners and deputy coroners[ shall]
have the full power and authority of peace officers in this state, including the power of arrest and the authority
to bear arms[,] and[ shall have the power and authority] to:
(a) Administer oaths;
(b) Enter upon public or private premises for the purpose of making investigations;
(c) Seize evidence;
(d) Interrogate persons;
(e) Require the production of medical records, books, papers, documents, or other evidence;
(f) Impound vehicles involved in vehicular deaths;
(g) Employ special investigators and photographers; and
(h) Expend funds for the purpose of carrying out[ the provisions of] KRS 72.410 to 72.470.
The fiscal court or urban-county government shall pay all reasonable expenses incurred by the coroner and his
or her deputy in carrying out his or her responsibilities under[ the provisions of] KRS 72.410 to 72.470.
(2) (a) 1. A[No] person shall not be eligible to hold the office of deputy coroner unless he or she holds a
high school diploma or its recognized equivalent. Every deputy coroner, other than a licensed
physician, shall be required as a condition of office to take during every calendar year he or she
is in office the training course of at least eighteen (18) hours provided by the Department of
Criminal Justice Training or other courses approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
after having completed the basic training course the first year of employment. The training
course shall include material developed by the cabinet and approved by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services on the human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome. The material shall include information on known modes of
transmission and methods of controlling and preventing these diseases with an emphasis on
appropriate behavior and attitude change.
2. Within three (3) years of initially assuming office, every deputy coroner shall be required as a
condition of office to take a course of at least four (4) hours provided by the Department of
Criminal Justice Training that shall include instruction on the grieving process and best practices
for providing a notice of death to a spouse or next of kin and may include instruction on other
similar topics, as set out in KRS 64.185(4)(b). A deputy coroner that has completed the course
shall not be required to retake the course.
(b) 1. Any deputy coroner subject to the training requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection who
fails to complete the mandated training shall be ineligible to perform the duties of deputy
coroner, and may be terminated by the coroner. The coroner shall make written notification of
the deputy coroner's ineligibility to perform his or her duties to the deputy coroner and to the
fiscal court or the legislative body of the consolidated local government, charter county
government, urban-county government, or unified local government.
2. The commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training, or the commissioner's
designee, may grant the deputy coroner an extension of no more than one hundred eighty
(180) days in which to complete the training requirements of this subsection if there are
extenuating circumstances beyond the control of the deputy coroner that prevent that
individual from completing the training during the required time period. If the deputy coroner
is unable to complete the training due to an injury or illness that prevents that individual from
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
performing the duties of the deputy coroner, the one hundred eighty day (180) extension shall
begin on the date that the deputy coroner resumes performing the duties of the deputy coroner.
Any deputy coroner who fails to successfully complete the training within the time period
granted by the extension shall be subject to the consequences set out in subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph.[The deputy coroner shall regain his or her eligibility upon successful
recompletion of the initial basic training course referenced in KRS 64.185(4), which shall be
evidenced by written certification provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training to the
coroner. Upon receipt of the certification, the coroner shall make written notification of the
reinstatement of eligibility to the deputy coroner and to the fiscal court or the legislative body of
the consolidated local government, charter county government, urban-county government, or
unified local government.
3. The compensation of a deputy coroner who becomes ineligible to perform his or her
duties under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be modified as follows:
a. From the coroner's written notification of ineligibility until the deputy coroner begins the
basic training course mandated by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the deputy coroner
shall receive no compensation;
b. From the first day that the deputy coroner begins the basic training course mandated by
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph until written notification of course outcome is received
by the coroner, the deputy coroner shall be compensated at his or her previously
established rate of compensation;
c. If the deputy coroner fails the basic training course mandated by subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph, the deputy coroner shall receive no compensation from the date of receipt of
notification of failure from Department of Criminal Justice Training to the coroner until
the deputy coroner begins anew the basic training course mandated by subparagraph 2. of
this paragraph, at which time the deputy coroner shall be compensated at his or her
previously established rate of compensation; and
d. If the deputy coroner successfully completes the basic training course mandated by
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph as evidenced by written certification provided by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training to the coroner, the deputy coroner shall receive
compensation as is normally determined for deputy coroners pursuant to statute.]
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.